Hawaii statutes.
Chapter 6D

protection of caves

Section

6D-1 Definitions

6D-2 Prohibitions

6D-3 Pollution

6D-4 Disturbance of native organisms

6D-5 Sale

6D-6 Commercial entry

6D-7 Access

6D-8 Burial discovery

6D-9 Liability

6D-10 Confidentiality

6D-11 General administrative penalties

6D-12 Criminal penalties

6D-13 Penalties cumulative

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next